Utah statutes.
78A-3-104.   Appellate court administrator.

The appellate court administrator shall appoint clerks and support staff as necessary for the operation of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals.  The duties of the clerks and support staff shall be established by the appellate court administrator, and powers established by rule of the Supreme Court.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

